Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 14. Uniform Act on Adoption and Medical Assistance.

§ 63.2-1400.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 264, cl. 2.

History.

Repealed by 2022, c. 264.

§ 63.2-1401.
Compacts authorized.

The Governor is authorized to develop, participate in the development of, negotiate and enter into one or more interstate compacts on behalf of this Commonwealth with other states to implement one or more of the purposes set forth in this chapter. When so entered into, and for so long as it remains in force, the compact shall have the force and effect of law.

History.

1988, c. 154, § 63.1-238.7; 2002, c. 747.

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

§ 63.2-1402.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Adoption assistance state”
means the state that is signatory to an adoption assistance agreement in a particular case.

“Residence state”
means the state of which the child is a resident by virtue of the residence of the adoptive parents.

“State”
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, or a territory or possession of or administered by the United States.

History.

1988, c. 154, § 63.1-238.8; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1403.
Contents of compacts.

A compact entered into pursuant to the authority conferred by this chapter shall have the following content:

A provision making it available for joinder by all states.

A provision or provisions for withdrawal from the compact upon written notice to the parties, but with a period of one year between the date of the notice and the effective date of the withdrawal.

A requirement that the protections afforded by or pursuant to the compact continue in force for the duration of the adoption assistance and be applicable to all children and their adoptive parents who, on the effective date of the withdrawal, are receiving adoption assistance from a party state other than the one in which they are resident and have their principal place of abode.

A requirement that each instance of adoption assistance to which the compact applies be covered by an adoption assistance agreement in writing between the adoptive parents and the child welfare agency of the state which undertakes to provide the adoption assistance, and further, that any such agreement be expressly for the benefit of the adopted child and enforceable by the adoptive parents and the state agency providing the adoption assistance.

Such other provisions as may be appropriate to implement the proper administration of the compact.

A compact entered into pursuant to the authority conferred by this chapter may contain the following provisions in addition to those required pursuant to subsection A:

Provisions establishing procedures and entitlements to medical, developmental, child care or other social services for the child in accordance with applicable laws, even though the child and the adoptive parents are in a state other than the one responsible for or providing the services or the funds to defray part or all of the costs thereof.

Such other provisions as may be appropriate or incidental to the proper administration of the compact.

History.

1988, c. 154, § 63.1-238.9; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1404.
Medical assistance; penalties.

A child with special needs resident in this Commonwealth who is the subject of an adoption assistance agreement with another state shall be entitled to receive a medical assistance identification from this Commonwealth upon the filing in the Department of a certified copy of the adoption assistance agreement obtained from the adoption assistance state. In accordance with regulations of the Department, the adoptive parents shall be required at least annually to show that the agreement is still in force or has been renewed.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall consider the holder of medical assistance identification pursuant to this section as any other holder of a medical assistance identification under the laws of this Commonwealth and shall process and make payment on claims on account of such holder in the same manner and pursuant to the same conditions and procedures as for other recipients of medical assistance.

The Department shall provide coverage and benefits not provided by the state plan for medical assistance in the residence state for a child who is in another state and who is covered by an adoption assistance agreement made in Virginia to the extent required by the agreement. However, there shall be no reimbursement for services or benefit amounts covered under any insurance or other third party medical contract or arrangement held by the child or the adoptive parents. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall adopt regulations implementing this subsection. The additional coverages and benefit amounts provided pursuant to this subsection shall be for services for which there is no federal financial contribution or which, if federally aided, are not provided by the residence state. Such regulations shall include procedures to be followed in obtaining prior approvals for services when such approval is required for the assistance.

The submission of any claim for payment or reimbursement for services or benefits pursuant to this section or the making of any statement in connection therewith, which claim or statement the maker knows or should know to be false, misleading or fraudulent shall be punishable as perjury and shall also be subject to a fine of not more than $10,000, or imprisonment for not more than two years, or both.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to medical assistance for children under adoption assistance agreements from states that have entered into a compact with this Commonwealth under which the other state provides medical assistance to children with special needs under adoption assistance agreements made by this Commonwealth. All other children entitled to medical assistance pursuant to adoption assistance agreements entered into by this Commonwealth shall be eligible to receive it in accordance with the laws and procedures applicable thereto.

History.

1988, c. 154, § 63.1-238.10; 2002, c. 747.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 27.

§ 63.2-1405.
Federal participation.

Consistent with federal law, the Department and the Department of Medical Assistance Services, in connection with the administration of this chapter and any compact pursuant hereto, shall include in any state plan made pursuant to the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-272), Titles IV-E and XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, and any other applicable federal laws, the provision of adoption assistance and medical assistance for which the federal government pays some or all of the costs. The Departments shall apply for and administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with law.

History.

1988, c. 154, § 63.1-238.11; 2002, c. 747.